West Virginia, session 2026, HB5681.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 7. registered Professional Nurses. §30-7-1. Definitions. As used in this article:"Advanced practice registered nurse" means a registered nurse who has acquired advanced clinical knowledge and skills preparing him or her to provide direct and indirect care to patients as a certified nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, certified registered nurse anesthetist, or clinical nurse specialist, who has completed a board-approved graduate-level education program and who has passed a board-approved national certification examination;"Board" means the West Virginia Board of Examiners for Registered Professional Nurses;"Collaborative relationship" means a working relationship, structured through a written agreement, in which an advanced practice registered nurse may prescribe drugs in collaboration with a qualified physician;"Direct patient care" means the provision of services to a sick, injured, mentally or physically disabled, elderly or fragile patient that requires some degree of interaction with that patient. Direct patient care may include assessment, treatment, counseling, procedures, self-care, patient education, administration of medication, and implementation of a care plan; "Practice of registered professional nursing" or "registered professional nursing" means the performance for compensation of any service requiring substantial specialized judgment and skill based on knowledge and application of principles of nursing derived from the biological, physical and social sciences, such as responsible supervision of a patient requiring skill in observation of symptoms and reactions and the accurate recording of the facts, or the supervision and teaching of other persons with respect to such principles of nursing, or in the administration of medications and treatments as prescribed by a licensed physician, a licensed dentist or a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, or the application of such nursing procedures as involve understanding of cause and effect in order to safeguard life and health of a patient and others; and"Temporary permit" means a permit authorizing the holder to practice registered professional nursing in this state until such permit is no longer effective or the holder is granted a license by the West Virginia State Board of Examiners for Registered Professional Nurses. §30-7-4. Organization and meetings of board; quorum; powers and duties generally; executive secretary; funds. (a) The board has all the powers and duties set forth in this article, in §30-1-1 et seq. of this code and elsewhere in law, including the ability to:(1) Hold meetings;(2) Establish procedures for submitting, approving, and rejecting applications for a license and permit;(3) Determine the qualifications of an applicant for a license and permit;(4) Establish the fees charged under the provisions of this article;(5) Issue, renew, restrict, deny, suspend, revoke, or reinstate a license and permit;(6) Prepare, conduct, administer, and grade written, oral, or written and oral examinations for a license;(7) Contract with third parties to administer the examinations required under the provisions of this article;(8) Maintain records of the examinations the board, or a third party, administers, including the number of persons taking the examination and the pass and fail rate;(9) Maintain an office and hire, discharge, establish the job requirements, and fix the compensation of employees, and contract with persons necessary to enforce the provisions of this article;(10) Employ investigators, attorneys, hearing examiners, consultants, and other employees as may be necessary who are exempt from the classified service and who serve at the will and pleasure of the board;(11) Delegate hiring of employees to the executive director;(12) Investigate alleged violations of the provisions of this article and legislative rules, orders, and final decisions of the board;(13) Conduct disciplinary hearings of persons regulated by the board;(14) Determine disciplinary action and issue orders;(15) Institute appropriate legal action for the enforcement of the provisions of this article;(16) Maintain an accurate registry of names and addresses of all persons regulated by the board;(17) Keep accurate and complete records of its proceedings, and certify the same as may be necessary and appropriate;(18) Public meeting minutes to its website within 14 days of a meeting approval; (19) Propose rules in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of this article;(20) Sue and be sued in its official name as an agency of this state; (21) Approve a nursing school;(22) Establish a nurse health program; and(23) Implement the provisions of the enhanced nurse licensure compact in accordance with §30-7B-1 et seq. of this code; (24) Coordinate with and assist the Center for Nursing in accordance with §30-7B-1 et seq. of this code; and(25) (23) Confer with the Attorney General or his or her assistant in connection with legal matters and questions.(b) All fees and other moneys collected by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be kept in a separate fund and expended solely for the purpose of this article. No part of this special fund shall revert to the General Funds of this state. The compensation provided by this article and all expenses incurred under this article shall be paid from this special fund. No compensation or expense incurred under this article shall be a charge against the General Funds of this state.(c) The board may not propose any rules or implement any policies that would prohibit advanced practice registered nurse from practicing without supervision of a physician. §30-7-6b. Special volunteer license; civil immunity for voluntary services rendered to indigents. (a) There is established a special volunteer license for advanced practice registered nurses retired or retiring from the active practice of nursing who wish to donate their expertise for the care and treatment of indigent and needy patients in the clinical setting of clinics organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge. The special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license shall be issued by the West Virginia Board of Examiners for Registered professional nurses to advanced practice registered nurses licensed or otherwise eligible for licensure pursuant to this article and the rules promulgated hereunder without the payment of an application fee, license fee or renewal fee, shall be issued for the remainder of the licensing period, and renewed consistent with the boards other licensing requirements. The board shall develop application forms for the special license provided in this subsection which shall contain the advanced practice registered nurse’s acknowledgment that: (1) The advanced practice registered nurse’s practice pursuant to the special volunteer advanced practice registered nurses license will be exclusively devoted to providing nursing care to needy and indigent persons in West Virginia; (2) The advanced practice registered nurse will not receive any payment or compensation, either direct or indirect, or have the expectation of any payment or compensation but may donate to the clinic the proceeds of any reimbursement, for any nursing services rendered pursuant to the special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license; (3) The advanced practice registered nurse will supply any supporting documentation that the board may reasonably require; and (4) The advanced practice registered nurse agrees to continue to participate in continuing education as required by the board for the special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license.(b) Any person licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse in this state whose license is in good standing may donate their expertise for the care and treatment of indigent and needy patients pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge to the patient. Services rendered pursuant to an arrangement may be performed in either the office of the advanced practice registered nurses or the clinical setting. (c) A An advanced practice registered nurse and his or her collaborating physician who render renders nursing service to indigent and needy patients of a clinic organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge pursuant to a special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic as authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section without payment or compensation or the expectation or promise of payment or compensation is immune from liability for any civil action arising out of any act or omission resulting from the rendering of the nursing service at the clinic unless the act or omission was the result of the advanced practice registered nurse’s and his or her collaborating physician’s gross negligence or willful misconduct. For the immunity pursuant to this subsection to apply, there must be a written agreement between the licensed practical advanced practice registered nurse and the clinic pursuant to which the advanced practice registered nurse will provide voluntary uncompensated nursing services under the control of pursuant to an arrangement with the clinic to patients of the clinic before the rendering of any services by the advanced practice registered nurse at the clinic: Provided, That any clinic entering into such written agreement is required to maintain liability coverage of not less than $1 million per occurrence. (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, a clinic organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge is not relieved from imputed liability for the negligent acts of a an advanced practice registered nurse rendering voluntary nursing services at or for the clinic pursuant to a special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or who renders such care and treatment pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic as authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.(e) For purposes of this section, "otherwise eligible for licensure" means the satisfaction of all the requirements for licensure as listed in section six of this article and in the rules promulgated thereunder, except the fee requirements of that section and of the legislative rules promulgated by the board relating to fees. (f) Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring the board to issue a special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license to any advanced practice registered nurse whose license is or has been subject to any disciplinary action or to any advanced practice registered nurse who has surrendered his or her license or caused such license to lapse, expire and become invalid in lieu of having a complaint initiated or other action taken against his or her license, or who has elected to place a an advanced practice registered nurse license in inactive status in lieu of having a complaint initiated or other action taken against his or her license, or who has been denied a an advanced practice registered nurse license.(g) Any policy or contract of liability insurance providing coverage for liability sold, issued or delivered in this state to any advanced practice registered nurse covered pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be read so as to contain a provision or endorsement whereby the company issuing such policy waives or agrees not to assert as a defense on behalf of the policyholder or any beneficiary thereof, to any claim covered by the terms of such policy within the policy limits, the immunity from liability of the insured by reason of the care and treatment of needy and indigent patients by a an advanced practice registered nurse who holds a special volunteer advanced practice registered nurse license or who renders such care and treatment pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic as authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. §30-7-15b. Eligibility for prescriptive authority; application; fee; collaborative relationships and agreements. (a) An advanced practice registered nurse shall be eligible to apply for authorization to prescribe drugs pursuant to section fifteen-a §30-7-15a of this article code after satisfying the following requirements:(1) Have applied for licensure or be licensed and certified in West Virginia as an advanced practice registered nurse;(2) Be at least eighteen years of age;(3) Have completed forty-five contact hours of education in pharmacology and clinical management of drug therapy under a program approved by the board, fifteen hours of which shall have been completed within the two-year period immediately prior to entering into a prerequisite collaborative relationship: initial licensure and each subsequent renewal: Provided, That an advanced practice registered nurse does not require a collaborative relationship in order to qualify under this section and §30-7-15a of this code;(4) Provide the board with evidence that he or she is a person of good moral character and not addicted to alcohol or the use of controlled substances;(5) Does not have his or her advanced practice registered nursing license, certification or registration in any jurisdiction suspended, limited or revoked; and (6) Submit a completed, notarized application to the board, accompanied by a fee as established by the board by rule.(b) The board shall authorize an applicant to prescribe, administer, and dispense prescription drugs under the terms of a collaborative agreement and in accordance with section fifteen-a §30-7-15a of this article code and applicable legislative rules if the applicant has met the prerequisites of subsection (a) of this section and the following additional prerequisites are satisfied:(1) The board is satisfied that the collaborating physician is licensed in good standing;(2) The collaborative agreement is sufficient in form;(1) (3) The applicant has completed the education requirements; and(2) (4) The applicant has submitted a completed application on forms developed by the board and paid an application fee established by the board in legislative rule: Provided, That an advanced practice registered nurse does not require a collaborative relationship in order to qualify under this section.(c) A collaborative agreement for a collaborative relationship for prescriptive practice between a physician and an advanced practice registered nurse shall be set forth in writing and include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Mutually agreed upon written guidelines or protocols for prescriptive authority as it applies to the advanced practice registered nurse’s clinical practice;(2) Statements describing the individual and shared responsibilities of the advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating physician;(3) Periodic and joint evaluation of prescriptive practice; and(4) Periodic joint review and updating of the written guidelines or protocols.(d) Verification of a collaborative agreement shall be filed with the board by the advanced practice registered nurse with documentation of completion of the education requirements described in subsection (a) of this section. The board shall forward a copy of the verified agreement to the board through which the collaborative physician is licensed.(e) The board shall, upon application, authorize an advanced practice registered nurse to prescribe prescription drugs in accordance with section fifteen-a of this article code without the further requirement of a collaborative agreement if the applicant has satisfied the following prerequisites:(1) Has practiced at least three years in a duly-documented collaborative relationship with granted prescriptive authority; and(2) Licensed in good standing with the board; and(3) Has submitted a completed application on forms developed by the board and paid an application fee established by the board in legislative rule.(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, the board may require an advanced practice registered nurse practice in a collaborative agreement if the board determines, by order arising out of the board’s complaint process, that a collaborative relationship is necessary for the rehabilitation of a licensee or for protection of the public.